Washington statutes.
RCW 41.45.203

Contribution rates for certain justices and judges—Teachers' retirement system.

(1) The required employer contribution rate in support of teachers' retirement system members employed as supreme court justices, court of appeals judges, and superior court judges who elect to participate under RCW 41.32.584(1), or who are newly elected or appointed after January 1, 2007, shall equal the teachers' retirement system employer contribution rate established under this chapter.

(2) The required contribution rate for members of the teachers' retirement system plan 1 employed as supreme court justices, court of appeals judges, and superior court judges who elect to participate under RCW 41.32.584(1), or who are newly elected or appointed after January 1, 2007, shall be the deductions established under RCW 41.50.235 plus three and seventy-six one-hundredths percent of pay.

[ 2007 c 492 s 12; 2006 c 189 s 18.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2006 c 189: See note following RCW 2.14.115.